Washington statutes.
RCW 36.35.020

"Tax title lands" defined—Held in trust for taxing districts.

The term "tax title lands" as used in this chapter shall mean any tract of land acquired by the county for lack of other bidders at a tax foreclosure sale. Tax title lands are held in trust for the taxing districts.

[ 2007 c 295 s 2; 1972 ex.s. c 150 s 2.]